Washington statutes.
RCW 18.340.020

Expedition of professional license.

(1)(a) Each authority shall establish procedures to expedite the issuance of a license regulated by each such authority to a person:

(i) Who is licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit in another state to perform professional services in that state; and

(ii) Whose spouse is the subject of a military transfer to Washington.

(b) The procedure must include a process for issuing the person a license within 30 days of receiving a completed application. A completed application means that the authority has received all supporting materials, related application fees, fingerprints, and required documentation associated with a criminal background check.

(2) Each authority in this title shall develop a method and adopt rules to authorize a person who meets the criteria in this section to perform services regulated by the authority in Washington by issuing the person a temporary license within 30 days of receiving a completed application. A completed application means that the authority has received a copy of the certificate issued by the other state for a certificated education professional, related application fees, fingerprints, and required documentation associated with a criminal background check. The license may be issued for a limited period of time of no less than 180 days to allow the person to perform services regulated by the authority while completing any specific additional requirements in Washington that are not related to training or practice standards of the profession that were not required in the other state in which the person is licensed, certified, or registered, or has a permit.

(3) Nothing in this section requires the authority to issue a license if the standards of the other state are substantially unequal to Washington standards.

(4) An applicant must state in the application that the applicant:

(a) Has requested verification from the other state or states that the person is currently licensed, certified, registered, or has a permit; and

(b) Is not subject to any pending investigation, charges, or disciplinary action by the regulatory body of the other state or states.

(5) If the authority finds reasonable cause to believe that an applicant falsely affirmed or stated either of the requirements under subsection (4)(a) or (b) of this section, the authority may summarily suspend the license pending an investigation or further action to discipline or revoke the license.

[ 2023 c 165 s 4; 2011 2nd sp.s. c 5 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2023 c 165 s 4: "Section 4 of this act takes effect October 1, 2023." [ 2023 c 165 s 11.]

Short title—2023 c 165: "This act may be known and cited as the military spouse employment act." [ 2023 c 165 s 1.]

Finding—Intent—2023 c 165: "The legislature finds that the lives of military spouses are dominated by frequent deployments and relocations, and one-third of military families move each year. Many military families depend on two incomes, and military spouses tend to be better educated than the civilian population, with approximately 34 to 50 percent working in fields that require a professional license. The length of time to credential after a move is a significant employment barrier, with one study finding 20 percent of military spouses waited at least 10 months for a license after moving to a new state. This wait contributes to higher rates of unemployment or underemployment for military spouses when compared to their civilian counterparts. Given the fiscal and economic constraints of military families and the readiness considerations of the department of defense, the legislature intends to help alleviate the career turmoil military spouses face while serving in our state." [ 2023 c 165 s 2.]

Implementation—2011 2nd sp.s. c 5: See note following RCW 18.340.010.